en: Oil pressure sensor signal output type: 4–20 mA current loop; Analog voltage; CAN (digital); LIN (digital); PWM (digital); Resistive (Ω); Other
it: Tipo di segnale di uscita del sensore di pressione dell'olio: Anello di corrente da 4–20 mA; Tensione analogica; CAN (digitale); LIN (digitale); PWM (digitale); Resistivo (Ω); Altro
zh-CN: 机油压力传感器信号输出类型: 4-20 mA 电流环路; 模拟电压; CAN（数字）; LIN（数字）; PWM（数字）; 电阻式 (Ω); 其他
pl: Typ sygnału wyjściowego czujnika ciśnienia oleju: Pętla prądowa 4–20 mA; Napięcie analogowe; CAN (cyfrowy); LIN (cyfrowy); PWM (cyfrowy); Rezystancyjny (Ω); Inny
el: Τύπος εξόδου σήματος αισθητήρα πίεσης λαδιού: Βρόχος ρεύματος 4–20 mA; Αναλογική τάση; CAN (ψηφιακό); LIN (ψηφιακό); PWM (ψηφιακό); Με αντίσταση (Ω); Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип изходен сигнал на сензора за налягане на маслото: Токова верига 4–20 mA; Аналогово напрежение; CAN (цифров); LIN (цифров); ШИМ (цифров); Съпротивителен (Ω); Друго
da: Signaloutputtype for olietrykssensor: 4-20 mA strømsløjfe; Analog spænding; CAN (digital); LIN (digital); PWM (digital); Resistiv (Ω); Andet
vi: Loại đầu ra tín hiệu cảm biến áp suất dầu: Vòng lặp dòng điện 4–20 mA; Điện áp analog; CAN (kỹ thuật số); LIN (kỹ thuật số); PWM (kỹ thuật số); Điện trở (Ω); Khác
ro-RO: Tip de ieșire a semnalului senzorului de presiune a uleiului: Buclă de curent 4-20 mA; Tensiune analogică; CAN (digital); LIN (digital); PWM (digital); Rezistiv (Ω); Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta izlaznog signala osjetnika tlaka ulja: Strujna petlja od 4 do 20 mA; Analogni napon; CAN (digitalni); LIN (digitalni); PWM (digitalni); Otpornički (Ω); Ostalo
cs: Typ výstupního signálu snímače tlaku oleje: Proudová smyčka 4–20 mA; Analogové napětí; CAN (digitální); LIN (digitální); PWM (digitální); Odporový (Ω); Ostatní
sv: Oljetryckssensorns signalutgångstyp: 4–20 mA strömslinga; Analog spänning; CAN (digital); LIN (digital); PWM (digital); Resistiv (Ω); Övrigt
hu: Olajnyomás-érzékelő jelkimenet típusa: 4–20 mA áramhurok; Analóg feszültség; CAN (digitális); LIN (digitális); PWM (digitális); Rezisztív (Ω); Egyéb
fr: Type de signal de sortie du capteur de pression d’huile: Boucle de courant 4–20 mA; Tension analogique; CAN (numérique); LIN (numérique); PWM (numérique); Résistif (Ω); Autre
th: ประเภทเอาต์พุตสัญญาณเซ็นเซอร์แรงดันน้ำมัน: กระแสวน 4–20 mA; แรงดันอนาล็อก; CAN (ดิจิทัล); LIN (ดิจิทัล); PWM (ดิจิทัล); ความต้านทาน (Ω); อื่นๆ
ja: 油圧センサー信号出力タイプ: 4〜20 mA カレントループ; アナログ電圧; CAN (デジタル); LIN (デジタル); PWM (デジタル); 抵抗式 (Ω); その他
sl-SI: Vrsta izhodnega signala senzorja tlaka olja: Tokovna zanka 4–20 mA; Analogna napetost; CAN (digitalno); LIN (digitalno); PWM (digitalno); Uporovno (Ω); Drugo
nb: Type signalutgang fra oljetrykksensor: 4–20 mA strømsløyfe; Analog spenning; CAN (digital); LIN (digital); PWM (digital); Resistiv (Ω); Annet
nl: Oliedruksensor signaal outputtype: 4–20 mA-stroomlus; Analoge spanning; CAN (digitaal); LIN (digitaal); PWM (digitaal); Weerstand (Ω); Overig
de: Typ des Signalausgangs des Öldrucksensors: 4-20 mA Stromschleife; Analoge Spannung; CAN (digital); LIN (digital); PWM (digital); Resistiv (Ω); Andere
sk-SK: Typ výstupného signálu snímača tlaku oleja: Prúdová slučka 4 – 20 mA; Analógové napätie; CAN (digitálny); LIN (digitálny); PWM (digitálny); Odporový (Ω); Iné
ru: Тип выходного сигнала датчика давления масла: Токовая петля 4–20 мА; Аналоговое напряжение; CAN (цифровой); LIN (цифровой); ШИМ (цифровой); Резистивный (Ом); Другое
fi: Öljynpaineanturin signaalin lähtötyyppi: 4–20 mA virtasilmukka; Analoginen jännite; CAN (digitaalinen); LIN (digitaalinen); PWM (digitaalinen); Resistiivinen (Ω); Muu
tr: Yağ basınç sensörü sinyal çıkış tipi: 4-20 mA akım döngüsü; Analog voltaj; CAN (dijital); LIN (dijital); PWM (dijital); Dirençli (Ω); Diğer
zh-TW: 油壓感測器訊號輸出類型: 4–20 mA 電流迴路; 類比電壓; CAN (數位); LIN (數位); PWM (數位); 電阻 (Ω); 其他
pt-BR: Sensor de pressão do óleo tipo de saída de sinal: Loop de corrente de 4 a 20 mA; Tensão analógica; CAN (digital); LIN (digital); PWM (digital); Resistivo (Ω); Outro
lt-LT: Alyvos slėgio jutiklio signalo išvesties tipas: 4–20 mA srovės kilpa; Analoginė įtampa; CAN (skaitmeninis); LIN (skaitmeninis); PWM (skaitmeninis); Rezistyvinis (Ω); Kita
pt-PT: tipo de saída de sinal do sensor de pressão de óleo: Circuito de corrente 4–20 mA; Tensão analógica; CAN (digital); LIN (digital); PWM (digital); Resistivo (Ω); Outro
es: Tipo de señal de salida del sensor de presión de aceite: Bucle de corriente de 4–20 mA; Voltaje analógico; CAN (digital); LIN (digital); PWM (digital); Resistivo (Ω); Otro
ko: 오일 압력 센서 신호 출력 유형: 4–20mA 전류 루프; 아날로그 전압; CAN(디지털); LIN(디지털); PWM(디지털); 저항(Ω); 기타